Utah statutes.
70A-2-709.   Action for the price.

(1)  When the buyer fails to pay the price as it becomes due the seller may
recover, together with any incidental damages under the next section, the
price
(a)  of goods accepted or of conforming goods lost or damaged within a
commercially reasonable time after risk of their loss has passed to the buyer;
and
(b)  of goods identified to the contract if the seller is unable after
reasonable effort to resell them at a reasonable price or the circumstances
reasonably indicate that such effort will be unavailing.
(2)  Where the seller sues for the price he must hold for the buyer any goods
which have been identified to the contract and are still in his control except
that if resale becomes possible he may resell them at any time prior to the
collection of the judgment. The net proceeds of any such resale must be
credited to the buyer and payment of the judgment entitles him to any goods
not resold.
(3)  After the buyer has wrongfully rejected or revoked acceptance of the
goods or has failed to make a payment due or has repudiated (Section
70A-2-610), a seller who is held not entitled to the price under this section
shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under the preceding
section.
